Idaho, session 2025, H0336.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 7-1203, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
7-1203. AVAILABLE REMEDIES. In addition to other remedies available
to the department or obligee, collection of any delinquency from an obligor
on behalf of an obligee shall be accomplished through any of the following
means:
(1) The department shall intercept and withhold tax refunds to satisfy
child support obligations pursuant to section 56-203D, Idaho Code.
(2) The department shall intercept and withhold a portion of any unem-
ployment benefit payable to an obligor pursuant to section 72-1365, Idaho
Code.
(3) The department shall administer a program to withhold a portion of
an obligor's income for the benefit of the obligee pursuant to chapter 12,
title 32, Idaho Code.
(4) The department shall intercept and withhold a portion of any vet-
eran's benefits payable to an obligor pursuant to state or federal law.
(5) The department shall attach, garnish, or intercept and withhold
a portion of any worker's compensation benefits which are payable to an
obligor pursuant to title 72, Idaho Code.
(6) The department shall intercept and retain any support to reimburse
the department for foster care assistance payments, as well as the care and
placement of the child in foster care.


(7) The department shall charge fees to compensate the department for
services rendered in establishment or enforcement of support obligations,
including:
(a) A twenty-five dollar ($25.00) application fee paid in advance of
any services;
(b) A twenty-five dollar ($25.00) fee to be deducted each time child
support is collected as a result of an income tax offset; and
(c) A thirty-five dollar ($35.00) annual service fee for each case in
which the department has collected and disbursed at least five hundred
fifty dollars ($550) of support in the federal fiscal year.
SECTION 2. That Section 7-1206, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
7-1206. DEPARTMENT LIEN FOR CHILD SUPPORT DELINQUENCY. (1) Upon a
delinquency under a child support order for which the department is or has
been providing child support enforcement services, a lien arises upon and
attaches to the real and personal property of an obligor. When the amount
of the lien is equal to or greater than the total support owing for at least
ninety (90) days, or two thousand dollars ($2,000), whichever is less, the
lien may be perfected by a filing with the office of the secretary of state.
A perfected lien shall include all subsequently arising delinquencies.
When a lien has been perfected pursuant to this section and the underlying
delinquency reaches a zero balance or is otherwise satisfied, the lien is
automatically released. Any support order or decree issued or modified af-
ter the effective date of this act shall include a provision notifying the
obligor that a lien will arise automatically upon a delinquency. A notice of
release of lien shall be filed pursuant to section 45-1908, Idaho Code.
(2) A lien arising out of a child support order or delinquency under
the laws of another state shall be given full faith and credit as if the lien
arose out of a child support order or delinquency under Idaho law.
(3) The department shall notify each obligor by certified mail of the
filing of the lien at the same time the notice is delivered to the secretary
of state. No such lien may be enforced until ten (10) days after notice of the
filing of the lien has been given to the obligor.
(4) The department shall notify consumer reporting agencies of any
non-custodial parent who owes overdue support exceeding two thousand dol-
lars ($2,000) and is at least three (3) months in arrears after the court
order is finalized. Notice shall be provided to the non-custodial parent
prior to the report being made, including the methods available for contest-
ing the accuracy of the information.
SECTION 3. That Section 32-1206, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
32-1206. JUDICIAL PROCEEDINGS FOR INCOME WITHHOLDING. (1) A proceed-
ing to enforce a duty of support is commenced:
(a) By filing a petition or complaint for an original action; or
(b) By motion in an existing action or under an existing case number.
(2) Venue for the action is in the district court of the county where the
dependent child resides or is present, where the obligor resides, or where


the prior support order was entered. The petition or motion may be filed by
the obligee, the state, or any agency providing care or support to the depen-
dent child.
(3) A filing fee shall not be assessed in cases brought on behalf of the
state of Idaho.
(4) A petition or motion shall include a sworn statement by the obligee,
stating the facts authorizing the issuance of the income withholding order,
pursuant to section 32-1204 or 32-1205, Idaho Code, and:
(a) The name, address, and social security number of the obligor;
(b) A copy of the support order;
(c) The name and address of the obligor's employer;
(d) The amount of any delinquency; and
(e) In cases not filed by the state, whether the obligee has received
public assistance from any source on behalf of the minor child, and, if
so, from which source(s).
(5) Upon receipt of a petition or motion, the court shall issue an in-
come withholding order pursuant to section 32-1204 or 32-1205, Idaho Code,
to the employer utilizing the required income withholding for support form
and shall provide a form for an answer to the income withholding order which
shall be returned to the court within ten (10) days. The court shall also
order the employer to remit the amount withheld to the department of health
and welfare within seven (7) business days after the date the amount would
have been paid or credited to the obligor. The department shall supply each
county with the required income withholding for support form and answers
that comply with the rules promulgated by the department, and which include
including:
(a) The maximum amount of current support, if any, to be withheld from
the obligor's earnings each month, or from each earnings disbursement;
(b) The total amount of the arrearage or reimbursement judgment previ-
ously entered by the court, if any, together with interest, if any; and
(c) The amount of arrearage payments specified in the support order, if
any.
(6) If the petition or motion indicates the obligee has received public
assistance from any source on behalf of a minor child, the clerk shall imme-
diately forward a copy of the petition or the motion to the department.
(7) The court retains continuing jurisdiction under this chapter until
all duties of support of the obligor, including any delinquency, have been
satisfied or until the order is otherwise unenforceable.
SECTION 4. That Section 32-1214F, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
32-1214F. NOTICE OF MEDICAL SUPPORT ORDER. Any support order or decree
that requires a child to be covered by a health benefit plan issued after July
1, 2003, shall include a statement in substantially the following form:
"Failure to provide medical insurance coverage may result in the
direct enforcement of a medical support order by either the obligee
or the Department of Health and Welfare. A national medical sup-
port notice will be sent to your employer, requiring your employer
to enroll the child in a health benefit plan as provided by Sections


32-1214A through 32-1214J, Idaho Code, and applicable rules of the
department.".
SECTION 5. That Section 32-1214G, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 6. That Chapter 12, Title 32, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 32-1214G, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
32-1214G. ENFORCEMENT OF MEDICAL SUPPORT. (1) In any case for which an
assignment of medical support is in effect, the department shall petition
the court to include health insurance that is available through employment
or another group health benefit plan to either parent, and the department
shall take any action necessary to ensure that one (1) parent secures and
maintains medical insurance required by the support order.
(2) An obligor may request an administrative review within twenty (20)
days after a notice of intent to enroll one (1) or more children in a health
benefit plan is mailed by the department.
(3) The department shall cancel a notice of intent to enroll or a na-
tional medical support notice if the parent does not owe medical support, the
parent is no longer obligated to provide medical support, or medical support
other than medicaid is already being provided by either parent.
SECTION 7. That Chapter 12, Title 32, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 32-1218, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
32-1218. REVIEW AND MODIFICATION OF SUPPORT ORDERS. (1) Each parent
subject to a child support order that is being enforced by the department
shall be notified of the right to request a review of the order by the de-
partment every thirty-six (36) months. Reviews shall not be conducted more
frequently unless there has been a substantial and material change in cir-
cumstances, including but not limited to:
(a) An increase or decrease in income or assets of either parent or
other person legally obligated for the support of a child;
(b) A substantial change in the needs of the child; or
(c) A change in custody or visitation rights of the non-custodial par-
ent.
(2) A support order shall be reviewed for possible modification:
(a) If requested by either parent;
(b) If requested by any state, tribal, or foreign child support ser-
vices agency; or
(c) Automatically, at least every thirty-six (36) months, in any case
where either parent is receiving support pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 601 et
seq.
(3) After a review pursuant to this section, each parent shall be noti-
fied of the outcome. The department shall only seek a modification of a sup-
port order if the review results in an obligation that differs from the ex-
isting order by at least fifteen percent (15%), but not less than fifty dol-
lars ($50.00) per month.


SECTION 8. That Section 56-203A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-203A. AUTHORITY OF DEPARTMENT TO ENFORCE CHILD SUPPORT -- SUPPORT
ENFORCEMENT SERVICES. (1) Whenever the department receives an application
for public assistance on behalf of a child and it shall appear to the satis-
faction of the department that said child has been abandoned by its parents,
or that the child and one (1) parent have been abandoned by the other parent,
or that the parent or other person who has a responsibility for the care, sup-
port or maintenance of such child has failed or neglected to give proper care
or support to such child, the department shall take appropriate action under
the provisions of this chapter, the abandonment or nonsupport statutes, or
other appropriate statutes of this state to ensure that such parent or other
person responsible shall pay for the care, support or maintenance of said de-
pendent child.
(2) The department may accept applications for support enforcement
services on behalf of persons who are not recipients of public assistance
and may take action as it deems appropriate to establish, modify or enforce
support obligations against persons owing a duty to pay support. Action to
establish support obligations may be taken under the abandonment or nonsup-
port statutes or other appropriate statutes of this state.
The department may charge fees to compensate it for services rendered in
establishment of or enforcement of support obligations. The director shall,
by rule, establish reasonable fees for support enforcement services, and
said schedules of fees shall be made available to all applicants for support
enforcement services. The department may, on showing of necessity, waive or
defer any such fee.
(3) Effective October 1, 1998, the The department shall maintain a
state case registry that contains records of each case in which enforcement
services are being provided under this section and each child support order
established or modified in the state from and after that date. Effective the
same date, the The department shall collect and disburse payments for all
support orders related to cases for which services are provided under this
section and each child support order established or modified after January
1, 1994, that is subject to income withholding orders. For child support
orders established prior to January 1, 1994, at the option of each county and
upon payment of the cost of the service, the department shall collect and
disburse payments.
SECTION 9. The rules contained in IDAPA 16.03.03, Idaho Department of
Health and Welfare, relating to Child Support Services, shall be null, void,
and of no force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 10. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.